North Dakota, session 69, SB2270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Chapter 43-17.6 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
43 - 17.6 - 01. Definitions .
As used in this chapter:
1. "Board" means the state board of medicine.
2. "Health care provider" means a person who:
a. Furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care procedures or services in the normal
course of business; and
b. Includes health systems, hospitals, hospita l - based facilities, freestanding
emergency facilities, and urgent care clinics.
3. "International medical program" means any medical school, residency program,
medical internship program, or entity that:
a. Provides physicians with medical education or training eligible for certification by
the educational commission on foreign medical graduates; or
b. Is substantially similar to the medical education or training required by the board
for licensure in this state.
4. "International physician" means an individual who:
a. Has been granted a medical doctorate or substantially similar degree by a
domestic or international medical program in good standing;
b. Maintained good standing with the medial licensing authority of the licensing
country within the previous five years without pending disciplinary action;
Page No. 1 25.1190.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Completed either:
(1) A residency or substantially similar postgraduate medical training program;
or
(2) Seven years of practice as a medical professional performing physician
duties in the licensing country after completing a medical doctorate;
d. Practiced medicine as a fully licensed or authorized physician in the licensing
country after completing the requirements under subdivision c;
e. Obtained certification by the educational council for foreign medical graduates or
a successor organization approved by the board;
f. Passed all three steps of the United States medical licensing examination; and
g. Demonstrates English language proficiency.
5. "Physician" means an individual who has obtained a medical doctorate or a
substantially similar degree and is licensed inside or outside the United States.
43 - 17.6 - 02. Provisional licensure program .
1. The board shall grant a provisional license to practice medicine to any international
physician who:
a. Has an offer of employment from a health care provider operating in this state;
b. Is eligible to obtain appropriate federal immigration status for medical practice;
c. Passes the United States medical licensing examination;
d. Meets all other requirements under subsection 4 of section 43 - 17.6 - 01; and
e. Completes the required application and pays applicable fees.
2. The board may revoke a provisional license if:
a. The physician ceases employment with a health care provider in this state, during
the provisional period; or
b. Clear and convincing evidence shows the physician violated the medical, safety,
competency, or conduct standards of this state.
3. An appeal of a provisional license revocation:
a. Must be filed with the district court within one hundred twenty days of revocation;
b. Must follow the procedures established in chapter 28 - 32; and
c. Must result in license reinstatement if the court finds the board's actions did not
meet the standards under subsection 2 .
Page No. 2 25.1190.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. A provisional license converts to a full medical license automatically after three years
of active practice in this state.
43 - 17.6 - 03. Additional provisions .
1. The board may:
a. Verify training equivalency;
b. Review examination results;
c. Conduct background investigations;
d. Require complete license applications; and
e. Collect necessary fees.
2. International physicians may:
a. Apply for provisional licensure before receiving federal work authorization but
may not begin practicing until federal work authorization is obtained; and
b. Obtain employment outside of the original sponsoring facility after receiving full
licensure.
Page No. 3 25.1190.01000